Hawaii, session 2026, SB2924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Kanehili homestead community has initiated the development of a multi‑phase community complex that will include a community hale, a lanai, an imu station, a craft hale, and a multi-sport court for pickleball, basketball, and volleyball.  This facility is designed to support the Kanehili homestead community's cultural, educational, and recreational needs, empowering residents and fostering a stronger sense of community cohesion. The legislature further finds that the community hale will serve as a cornerstone of this complex, providing a dedicated space to practice and celebrate Hawaiian culture, host educational programs, and support community-based initiatives aligned with the principles of the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act of 1920, as amended.  The estimated cost of the community hale is $15,000,000, including a new access road and parking lot, with the community committed to raising the remaining funds for the broader complex through direct fundraising efforts.  The legislature acknowledges that this appropriation underscores the community's dedication to self-determination. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the issuance of general obligation bonds for appropriation to the department of Hawaiian home lands for a capital improvement project to construct the Kanehili community hale and related infrastructure at the Kanehili homestead. SECTION 2. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $15,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of financing a capital improvement project as follows: 1.   To be expended by the department of Hawaiian home lands: A.   Kanehili homestead, Oahu Construction of a community hale, a new access road, and a parking lot. Construction             $15,000,000 Total funding                           $15,000,000 SECTION 3. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________